Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 5 Weed and Pest Control

Cross references. —

As to prohibition against sale of noxious weed seeds, see §

11-12-104

.

As to requiring screenings to be free from noxious weed seeds, see §

11-12-108

.

As to expenditure of moneys derived from grazing fees under Taylor Grazing Act, see §

9-4-404

.

Lowest resident bidder, denied spraying contract by private
corporation, not denied property right. —

A dusting pilot engaged in the weed and pest control business,
who was denied a spraying contract by a private, nonprofit corporation
despite being the lowest resident bidder, did not establish his federal
civil rights claim. The private corporation's receipt of substantial
amount of public funding from a county weed and pest control district,
a public corporation, did not convert its status to that of a public
corporation. Thus, the pilot had no more than a unilateral expectation
of a statutory preference right (§

16-6-102

), and not a legitimate claim of entitlement, i.e., property
right.
Wright v. No Skiter, Inc., 774 F.2d 422,

1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 21844

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1985).

Weed and pest board without power to direct tax amount. —

Nothing in all of this chapter, particularly §

11-5-105

, relating to powers and duties of the county weed and pest district board, nor the provisions of the Municipal Budget Act (now repealed), specifically invests the board with the power to direct the board of county commissioners as to the amount of the tax necessary to carry out this chapter. State ex rel. Albany County Weed & Pest Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 592 P.2d 1154,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1979).